Utah statutes.
63M-5-201.   Prepayment of ad valorem property taxes on natural resources or
industrial facility.
The developer also may prepay, with the consent of the governing bodies of the
units of local government affected, to the county treasurer, or to other
persons authorized by the governing body of a unit of local government under
Section 63M-5-306, a portion of the ad valorem property taxes which the
developer anticipates will be imposed by the unit of local government under
Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 9, in connection with the natural resources or
industrial facility.  Ad valorem property taxes prepaid under this chapter may
not act as an abatement of the ad valorem property tax but rather shall be
construed as a prepayment for which, notwithstanding Section 59-2-1321 or any
statute of limitations to the contrary, a credit will be given the developer
making the prepayment at the time the ad valorem property taxes become due and
otherwise payable.
